Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF536.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 2354HH (3) 91 jda/jh H.F. 536 Section 1. Section 80.5, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 1 following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 13. a. The department shall cooperate 3 with the director of the department of natural resources in the 4 development of the model program described in section 455A.4, 5 subsection 1, paragraph âkâ . 6 b. The department shall deem a studentâs completion of 7 the model program described in section 455A.4, subsection 1, 8 paragraph âkâ , as a successful completion of approved firearm 9 safety training under section 724.9. 10 Sec. 2. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 11 by adding the following new paragraph: 12 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0t. Be subject to and comply with the 13 requirements of section 280.36 relating to hunting, wildlife, 14 and firearms curricula or extracurricular activities in the 15 same manner as a school district. 16 Sec. 3. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 17 by adding the following new paragraph: 18 NEW PARAGRAPH . r. Be subject to and comply with the 19 requirements of section 280.36 relating to hunting, wildlife, 20 and firearms curricula or extracurricular activities in the 21 same manner as a school district. 22 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 280.36 Hunting, wildlife, and firearms 23 ââ curricula and extracurricular activities. 24 1. In grades six through eight, the board of directors of 25 each school district and the authorities in charge of each 26 accredited nonpublic school shall offer or make available as 27 part of the physical education, health, or science instruction, 28 or as an extracurricular activity, the model program developed 29 by the department of natural resources and the department 30 of public safety pursuant to section 455A.4, subsection 1, 31 paragraph âkâ . The practical components of such curricula or 32 extracurricular activity, including hands-on firearm safety 33 demonstrations, must be conducted under controlled conditions 34 with appropriate supervision and safety protocols. 35 -1- LSB 2354HH (3) 91 jda/jh 1/ 6 H.F. 536 2. The board of directors of a school district or the 1 authorities in charge of an accredited nonpublic school 2 shall not allow a student to participate in the curricula or 3 extracurricular activity described in subsection 1 unless 4 the studentâs parent or guardian submits to the principal 5 of the studentâs school written consent for the student to 6 participate. 7 3. If the board of directors of a school district or 8 the authorities in charge of an accredited nonpublic school 9 offer or make available the model program as part of the 10 physical education, health, or science curricula, the school 11 district or accredited nonpublic school shall not require a 12 student to participate in such curricula if the studentâs 13 parent or guardian submits to the principal of the studentâs 14 school a written request for the student to be excused from 15 participation. 16 4. A school employee or contractor providing instruction 17 related to the model program developed by the department of 18 natural resources and the department of public safety pursuant 19 to section 455A.4, subsection 1, paragraph âkâ , must satisfy all 20 of the following requirements: 21 a. The employee or contractor must have successfully 22 completed a hunter education course approved by the natural 23 resources commission and been issued a certificate of 24 completion under section 483A.27. 25 b. The employee or contractor must have successfully 26 completed approved firearm safety training under section 724.9. 27 5. The board of directors of a school district or the 28 authorities in charge of an accredited nonpublic school 29 may collaborate with local conservation organizations, law 30 enforcement agencies, and community groups to enhance such 31 curricula or extracurricular activities provided pursuant to 32 this section. 33 6. The board of directors of each school district and the 34 authorities in charge of each accredited nonpublic school shall 35 -2- LSB 2354HH (3) 91 jda/jh 2/ 6 H.F. 536 provide information to the department of natural resources 1 related to the number of students who complete the curricula or 2 extracurricular activity described in subsection 1. 3 Sec. 5. Section 455A.4, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 4 by adding the following new paragraph: 5 NEW PARAGRAPH . k. (1) Develop, in consultation with 6 the department of public safety, and distribute to school 7 districts, accredited nonpublic schools, charter schools, and 8 innovation zone schools, an age-appropriate model program for 9 students enrolled in grades six through eight that includes 10 curricula related to all of the following: 11 (a) Firearm safety, handling, and storage. 12 (b) Iowa hunting laws and regulations. 13 (c) Wildlife conservation and ethical hunting practices. 14 (d) Emergency preparedness, outdoor survival skills, and 15 first aid. 16 (2) The director shall issue a certificate of completion of 17 a hunter education course to a student who completes a course 18 that uses the model program described in subparagraph (1). 19 (3) The director shall, in consultation with the department 20 of public safety, maintain a database of students who have 21 obtained a hunter education certificate, or have been deemed 22 by the department of public safety to have successfully 23 completed approved firearm safety training under section 24 724.9, as a result of completing the model program described 25 in subparagraph (1), to streamline licensing and recordkeeping 26 processes. 27 (4) The director shall, in consultation with the department 28 of public safety, submit an annual report to the general 29 assembly, on or before June 30 each year, that contains 30 information related to the number of students in this state who 31 participate in the model program described in subparagraph (1), 32 the number of students who have obtained a hunter education 33 certificate, or have been deemed by the department of public 34 safety to have successfully completed approved firearm safety 35 -3- LSB 2354HH (3) 91 jda/jh 3/ 6 H.F. 536 training under section 724.9, as a result of completing the 1 model program described in subparagraph (1), and feedback from 2 educators, students, and parents. 3 (5) The director shall review the model program described in 4 subparagraph (1) every five years and revise the model program 5 as necessary to ensure continued effectiveness, safety, and 6 compliance with state and federal standards. 7 Sec. 6. STATE MANDATE FUNDING SPECIFIED. In accordance 8 with section 25B.2, subsection 3, the state cost of requiring 9 compliance with any state mandate included in this Act shall 10 be paid by a school district from state school foundation aid 11 received by the school district under section 257.16. This 12 specification of the payment of the state cost shall be deemed 13 to meet all of the state funding-related requirements of 14 section 25B.2, subsection 3, and no additional state funding 15 shall be necessary for the full implementation of this Act 16 by and enforcement of this Act against all affected school 17 districts. 18 Sec. 7. APPLICABILITY. The following apply to school years 19 beginning on or after July 1, 2026: 20 1. The section of this Act enacting section 256E.7, 21 subsection 2, paragraph â0tâ. 22 2. The section of this Act enacting section 256F.4, 23 subsection 2, paragraph ârâ. 24 3. The section of this Act enacting section 280.36. 25